Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-12,107
Destroy, deface, or remove parts; unlawful; exception; violation; penalty.

No person other than one authorized by the appropriate local authority or state agency shall destroy, deface, or remove any part of a motorboat which is left unattended on a highway or other public place without a hull identification number affixed or which is abandoned. Anyone violating this section is guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 2004, LB 560, § 20.